Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,113
Drug product selection; pharmacist; practitioner; negligence; what constitutes.

(1) Drug product selection by a pharmacist pursuant to the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act shall not constitute the practice of medicine.

(2) Drug product selection by a pharmacist pursuant to the act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall not constitute evidence of negligence if the drug product selection was made within the reasonable and prudent practice of pharmacy.

(3) When drug product selection by a pharmacist is permissible under the act, such drug product selection shall not constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the prescribing practitioner. The failure of a prescribing practitioner to provide that there shall be no drug product selection in any case shall not constitute evidence of negligence or malpractice on the part of such prescribing practitioner.

Laws 1977, LB 103, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 77;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5405;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 64;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 15.